bg-BG: Мебели > Шкафове и съхранение > Шкафове и шкафчета с ключалка за съхранение: Гаражни шкафове за съхранение; Шкафчета; Шкафове за обувки; Шкафове за съхранение
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > ตู้และที่จัดเก็บ > ตู้และล็อคเกอร์เก็บของ: ตู้เก็บของในโรงรถ; ตู้ล็อกเกอร์; ตู้เก็บรองเท้า; ตู้เก็บของ
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Omare in shranjevanje > Omarice in predali za shranjevanje: Omarice za shranjevanje v garaži; Omarice s ključavnico; Omarice za čevlje; Omarice za shranjevanje
fr: Meubles > Armoires et meubles de rangement > Casiers et armoires de rangement: Armoires de rangement pour garage; Casiers; Meubles à chaussures; Armoires de rangement
ko: 가구 > 캐비닛/수납장 > 물품 보관함/로커: 차고 수납 캐비닛; 라커; 신발장; 수납 캐비닛
hr-HR: Namještaj > Elementi i pohrana > Elementi i ormarići za odlaganje: Garažni elementi za pohranu; Ormarići; Elementi za obuću; Elementi za pohranu
nb: Møbler > Skap og lagring > Lagringsskap: Garasjeskap; Garderobeskap; Skoskap; Oppbevaringsskap
el: Έπιπλα > Ντουλάπια & αποθήκευση > Ντουλάπια αποθήκευσης & ντουλάπια με κλειδαριά: Ντουλάπια αποθήκευσης γκαράζ; Ερμάρια; Παπουτσοθήκες; Ντουλάπια αποθήκευσης
lt-LT: Baldai > Spintelės ir sandėliavimas > Sandėliavimo spintelės: Garažo daiktų laikymo spintelės; Spintelės; Batų spintos; Daiktų laikymo spintelės
tr: Mobilyalar > Dolaplar ve Saklama Mobilyaları > Saklama Kabinleri ve Dolapları: Garaj depolama dolapları; Kilitli dolaplar; Ayakkabı dolapları; Saklama dolapları
sv: Möbler > Skåp och lagring > Förvaringsskåp och garderober: Förvaringsskåp för garage; Låsbara skåp; Skoskåp; Förvaringsskåp
zh-CN: 家具 > 柜子/储物 > 储物柜/箱: 车库储物柜; 带锁储物柜; 鞋柜; 储物柜
cs: Nábytek > Skříně a úložné prostory > Úložné a šatní skříňky: Skříně do garáže; Šatní skříňky; Botníky; Úložné skříňky
it: Arredamento > Armadietti e portaoggetti > Armadietti e stipi: Armadi da garage; Armadietti; Scarpiere; Armadietti portaoggetti
hu: Bútor > Szekrények és tárolók > Tárolószekrények: Garázsi tárolószekrények; Öltözőszekrények; Cipősszekrények; Tárolószekrények
en: Furniture > Cabinets & Storage > Storage Cabinets & Lockers: Garage Storage Cabinets; Lockers; Shoe Cabinets; Storage Cabinets
es: Mobiliario > Armarios y almacenamiento > Taquillas y armarios de almacenamiento: Gabinetes de almacenamiento para garaje; Casilleros; Gabinetes para zapatos; Gabinetes de almacenamiento
nl: Meubelen > Kasten en opbergmeubelen > Opbergkasten en -kluisjes: Garage-opbergkasten; Lockers; Schoenenkasten; Opbergkasten
fi: Huonekalut > Kaapit ja säilytys > Säilytyskaapit ja -lokerot: Autotallin säilytyskaapit; Pukukaapit; Kenkäkaapit; Säilytyskaapit
pl: Meble > Szafy i przechowywanie > Szafki biurowe: Szafy do przechowywania w garażu; Szafki skrytkowe; Szafki na buty; Szafy i szafki do przechowywania
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Armários e armazenamento > Armários e cacifos de armazenamento: Armários de arrumação para garagem; Cacifos; Sapateiras; Armários de arrumação
ja: 家具 > 収納家具 > ロッカー・キャビネット: ガレージ収納キャビネット; ロッカー; 下駄箱・シューズキャビネット; 収納キャビネット
pt-BR: Móveis > Armários e armazenamento > Armários e gabinetes de armazenamento: Armários de armazenamento para garagem; Armários de vestiário (Lockers); Sapateiras; Armários de armazenamento
da: Møbler > Skabe og opbevaring > Opbevaringsskabe og -kabinetter: Opbevaringsskabe til garagen; Omklædningsskabe; Skoskabe; Opbevaringsskabe
vi: Đồ gỗ > Tủ và đồ đựng > Tủ và ngăn chứa đồ: Tủ để đồ gara; Tủ khóa có ngăn; Tủ để giày; Tủ đựng đồ
zh-TW: 家具 > 櫥櫃和收納 > 置物櫃: 車庫收納櫃; 置物櫃; 鞋櫃; 收納櫃
ru: Мебель > Шкафы и мебель для хранения > Запирающиеся шкафчики: Шкафы для гаража; Локеры; Шкафы для обуви; Шкафы для хранения
de: Möbel > Schränke > Aufbewahrungs- & Aussteuertruhen: Garagenschränke; Spinde; Schuhschränke; Aufbewahrungsschränke
ro-RO: Mobilier > Dulăpioare și spații de depozitare > Dulăpioare și dulapuri de depozitare: Dulapuri de depozitare pentru garaj; Dulapuri cu încuietoare; Pantofare; Dulapuri de depozitare
sk-SK: Nábytok > Úložné skrinky > Úložné skrine a skrinky: Garážové úložné skrine; Skrinky; Skrinky na topánky; Úložné skrinky